Hawaii statutes.
§803-34 Contents. The warrant shall be
in writing, signed by the magistrate, with the magistrate's official
designation, directed to some sheriff or other officer of justice, and
commanding the sheriff or other officer to search for and bring before the
magistrate, the property or articles specified in the affidavit, to be disposed
of according to justice, and also to bring before the magistrate for
examination the person in whose possession the property or articles may be
found. [PC 1869, c 48, §5; RL 1925, §3962; RL 1935, §5414; RL 1945, §10719; RL
1955, §255-19; HRS §708-34; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1989,
c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Case Notes

Absolute certainty, that objects sought are where the
affidavit alleges, is not required. 56 H. 366, 537 P.2d 8 (1975).

See 3 H. 393 (1872).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next